Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.690

Crime laboratory analysis fee—Court imposition—Collection.

(1) When an adult offender has been adjudged guilty of violating any criminal statute of this state and a crime laboratory analysis was performed by a state crime laboratory, in addition to any other disposition, penalty, or fine imposed, the court shall levy a crime laboratory analysis fee of one hundred dollars for each offense for which the person was convicted. Upon a verified petition by the person assessed the fee, the court may suspend payment of all or part of the fee if it finds that the person does not have the ability to pay the fee.

(2) All crime laboratory analysis fees assessed under this section shall be collected by the clerk of the court and forwarded to the state general fund, to be used only for crime laboratories. The clerk may retain five dollars to defray the costs of collecting the fees.

[ 2015 c 265 s 30; 1992 c 129 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2015 c 265: See note following RCW 13.50.010.